Utah statutes.
10-8-50.   Disturbing the peace -- Public intoxication -- Fighting --
Obscene language -- Disorderly conduct -- Lewd behavior -- Interference with
officers -- Trespass.
(1)  Boards of commissioners and city councils of cities may provide for the
punishment of any person or persons for:
(a)  disturbing the peace or good order of the city;
(b)  disturbing the peace of any person or persons;
(c)  disturbing any lawful assembly;
(d)  public intoxication;
(e)  challenging, encouraging, or engaging in fighting;
(f)  using obscene or profane language in a place or under circumstances which
could cause a breach of the peace or good order of the city;
(g)  engaging in indecent or disorderly conduct;
(h)  engaging in lewd or lascivious behavior or conduct in the city; and
(i)  interfering with any city officer in the discharge of his duty.
(2)  Boards of commissioners and city councils of cities may provide for the
punishment of trespass and such other petty offenses as the board of
commissioners or city council may  consider proper.
(3) (a)  A woman's breast feeding, including breast feeding in any  location
where she otherwise may rightfully be, does not under any circumstance
constitute a lewd or indecent  act, irrespective of whether or not the breast
is covered during or incidental to feeding.
(b)  Boards of commissioners and city councils of cities may not prohibit a
woman's breast feeding in any location where she otherwise may rightfully  be,
irrespective of whether the breast is uncovered during or incidental to the
breast feeding.
